Hawaii statutes.
§457-9 Renewal of license; denial,
suspension, or revocation of license for default of student loan, student loan
repayment contract, or scholarship contract; inactivation and reactivation of
license; restoration of forfeited license. (a) The license of every
person licensed or granted prescriptive authority shall expire on June 30 of
every odd-numbered year and shall be renewed biennially, except as provided in
this section. Biennially in each odd-numbered year, the board shall make
available an application for renewal of license before the deadline set forth
by the board to every person to whom a license was issued or renewed during the
biennium. The applicant shall complete the application and submit it to the
board with a renewal fee, and shall also submit, beginning with the July 1,
2019, licensing biennium, a full set of electronic fingerprints for the purpose
of obtaining federal and state criminal history record checks in accordance
with section 846-2.7 directly to the Hawaii criminal justice data center for
processing with the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The applicant shall bear
the cost of the fingerprint processing and the application shall not be
considered complete until the results of the criminal history record check has
been received by the board; and all required documents on or before the
deadline set by the board. The applicant shall provide documents from proper
agencies or parties of any criminal conviction or any disciplinary action taken
or pending in this State or any other state in the United States or any
territory or possession under the jurisdiction of the United States within the
two years prior to application for renewal of license. Upon receipt of the
application and fee, the board shall verify the accuracy of the application and
issue to the applicant a certificate of renewal for the biennium expiring two
years hence on the deadline set by the board. The renewal shall render the
holder thereof a legal practitioner of nursing for the period stated on the
renewal form.

(b) Any licensee who fails to renew a license
as provided in subsection (a) but continues to practice shall be considered an
illegal practitioner and shall be subject to the penalties provided for
violations of this chapter. The failure to timely renew a license, the failure
to pay all applicable fees, the dishonoring of any check upon first deposit, or
the failure to comply with any other requirement provided by law shall cause
the license to be automatically forfeited; provided that the person's license
may be restored by the board within two years after the date of forfeiture upon
compliance with the licensing renewal fees, penalty fees, and compliance
resolution fund fees.

A nurse who does not intend to practice nursing
in the State and elects to be placed on inactive status shall so indicate in
writing during the license renewal period or by so indicating on the license
renewal application, and paying inactivation and all appropriate fees. Should
the nurse wish to resume nursing at some future time, the nurse shall notify
the board in writing and remit the reactivation and renewal fees; submit an application
form as provided in subsection (a); and beginning with the July 1, 2019,
licensing biennium, submit a full set of electronic fingerprints for the
purpose of obtaining federal and state criminal history record checks in
accordance with section 846-2.7 directly to the Hawaii criminal justice data
center for processing with the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The applicant
shall bear the cost of the fingerprint processing and the application shall not
be considered complete until the results of the criminal history record check
has been received by the board. A nurse who has not actively practiced in this
State or any other state in the United States or any territory or possession
under the jurisdiction of the United States for more than five years may be
required by the board to submit proof of continued competency by retaking and
passing the licensing examination or successfully completing appropriate
continuing education recognized by the board.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision in this
chapter to the contrary, the board shall not renew or reinstate, or shall deny,
suspend, or revoke, any license or application if the board has received
certification from an administering entity pursuant to chapter 436C that the
licensee or applicant is in default or breach of any obligation under any
student loan, student loan repayment contract, or scholarship contract that
financed the licensee's or applicant's education, or has failed to comply with
a repayment plan.

The board, in receipt of a certification
pursuant to chapter 436C, as applicable, and without further review or hearing,
shall:

(1) Suspend the license;

(2) Deny the application or request for renewal of
the license; or

(3) Deny the request for reinstatement of the
license,

and unless otherwise provided by law, shall renew,
reinstate, or grant the license only upon receipt of an authorization from the
administering entity. [L 1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 26, §1; am L 1975,
c 118, §19; am L 1983, c 119, §7; am L 1984, c 7, §47; am L 1992, c 202, §110
and c 234, §3; am L 2002, c 226, §7; am L 2003, c 133, §11; am L 2004, c 88,
§6; am L 2006, c 30, §1; am L 2014, c 46, §8; am L 2016, c 97, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next